src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!  ----------------------
!! The Viena Karelian language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but 


LEXICON PROPN_SGNOM_0

+Sg+Nom:0 # ;

LEXICON PROPN_SGPAR_A

+Sg+Par:a # ;

LEXICON PROPN_SGPAR_O

+Sg+Par:o # ;

LEXICON PROPN_SGPAR_E

+Sg+Par:e # ;

LEXICON PROPN_SGPAR_TÄ

+Sg+Par:tä # ;

LEXICON PROPN_SGPAR_TA

+Sg+Par:ta # ;

LEXICON PROPN_PLGEN_JEN

+Pl+Gen:jen # ;

LEXICON PROPN_PLPAR_JA

+Pl+Par:ja  # ;


LEXICON PROPN_PLGEN_IEN

+Pl+Gen:ien # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_BACK

0 PROPN_CASES_PL_STRONG_BACK ;
0 PROPN_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_STRONG_BACK

+Pl+Ill:ih # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK

+Pl+Gen:ien # ;
+Pl+All:ile # ;
+Pl+Abe:itta # ;
+Pl+Ade:illa # ;
+Pl+Ela:ista # ;
+Pl+Ine:issa # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_FRONT

0 PROPN_CASES_PL_STRONG_FRONT ;
0 PROPN_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_STRONG_FRONT

+Pl+Ill:ih # ;
+Pl+Ess:inä # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT

+Pl+Gen:ien # ;
+Pl+All:ile # ;
+Pl+Abe:ittä # ;
+Pl+Ade:illä # ;
+Pl+Ela:istä # ;
+Pl+Ine:issä # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK

0  PROPN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0  PROPN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK

+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK

+Sg+Abl:lta # ;
+Sg+Ade:lla # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Sg+Ela:šta # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:šša # ;
+Sg+Ine:ssa # ;
+Sg+Ine+Clt/Ki:ssaki # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT

0  PROPN_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
0  PROPN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT

+Sg+Ill:h # ;

LEXICON PROPN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT
+Sg+Abl:ltä # ;
+Sg+Ade:llä # ;
+Sg+All:le # ;
+Sg+Ela:štä # ;
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ine:s # ;
+Sg+Ine:ššä # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
